California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The road commissioner may issue written permits, as provided in this chapter, authorizing the permittee to do any of the following acts:

(a) Make an opening or excavation for any purpose in any county highway.

(b) Place, change or renew an encroachment.

(c) Place or display in, under or over any county highway any kind of advertising sign or device. Any such sign or device placed or displayed contrary to the provisions of this section is a public nuisance and the road commissioner may immediately remove it. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the posting of any notice in the manner required by law or by the order of any court of this state.

(d) Plant, remove, cut, cut down, injure or destroy any tree, shrub, plant or flower growing within any county highway.

Any person who does any of the acts specified in this section, without the authority of such a permit, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is liable to the public agency for all expenses and damages caused thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

1461.

Any act done under the authority of a written permit, issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be done in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, and the terms and conditions of such permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.

Any permit issued under the provisions of this chapter may provide that the permittee will pay the entire expense of replacing the highway in as good condition as before, and may provide such other conditions as to the location and the manner in which the work is to be done as the road commissioner finds necessary for the protection of the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.

Any permit issued to a public agency or a public utility having lawful authority to occupy the highways shall contain a provision that in the event the future improvement of the highway necessitates the relocation of such encroachment the permittee will relocate the same at his sole expense. In said event the road commissioner shall serve on the permittee his written demand specifying the place of relocation, and specifying a reasonable time within which the work of relocation must be commenced. The permittee must commence such relocation within the time specified in said demand and thereafter diligently prosecute the same to completion.

All permits other than those issued to public agencies or a public utility having lawful authority to occupy the highways are revocable on five days’ notice and the encroachment must be removed or relocated as may be specified by the road commissioner in the notice revoking the permit and within a reasonable time specified by the road commissioner unless the permit provides a specified time.

Public utilities may be required, within a reasonable time, to relocate such of their facilities as interfere with an enlarged public use of the highway, except in those cases where the enlarged use of the highway involves a state freeway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.

The road commissioner may, but is not required to, supervise any work done under any permit issued under the provisions of this chapter, in which event the permittee shall pay the reasonable cost of such supervision to the road commissioner, but no cost of supervision shall be charged by the road commissioner to any public corporation, provided, however, this section shall not operate to prevent charges made pursuant to Government Code Section 6103.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.

(a) Permittees may excavate openings in county highways to make repairs in cases of emergency requiring immediate action. In such cases the appropriate representative of the road commissioner shall be promptly notified of any such action, and such permittee, at his own expense, shall immediately replace such county highway in as good condition as before such excavation.

(b) A public agency supplying water service to its inhabitants may, within its corporate limits, excavate a county highway without a permit in cases of emergency requiring immediate action; but in such cases the county highway shall, at the expense of the public agency, be replaced in as good condition as before such excavation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1466.

The road commissioner may delegate to any city any of the road commissioner’s powers, duties, and authority, other than those of approval, under this chapter as to any county highway, or any part thereof, within such city, and may withdraw any such delegation of authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1467.

The road commissioner may require the applicant to file with the road commissioner a satisfactory bond payable to the people of the county in such amount as the road commissioner deems sufficient, conditioned on the proper compliance by the permittee with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1468.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, such a bond shall not be required of any public agency or public utility having lawful authority to occupy the highways which is authorized by law to establish or maintain any works or facilities in, under or over any public highway, nor shall the application of any such public agency or public utility for a permit be denied.

The road commissioner may require of any such applicant a bond in a sum not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), if such applicant has in fact prior to such application failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or with the provisions of a previous permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1469.

Any city, municipal utility district, municipal water district, public utility having lawful authority to occupy the highways or metropolitan water district is entitled to a blanket permit issued by the road commissioner, renewable annually, for the installation of its service connections and for ordinary maintenance of its facilities located or installed in county highways; but the road commissioner may revoke any such blanket permit if the permittee fails to comply with the provisions of this article. When any such permit is revoked in a proper case such municipal utility district, municipal water district or metropolitan water district or public utility is entitled to a permit only on furnishing a bond as provided in Section 1467.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------

1470.

This chapter shall not supersede the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7030), Division 4 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Obstructions and Injuries to County Highways [1480. - 1496.]

1480.

As used in this chapter:

(a) The term “highway” includes all or any part of the entire width of right of way of a county highway, whether or not such entire area is actually used for highway purposes.

(b) The term “encroachment” includes any structure or object of any kind or character placed, without the authority of law, either in, under or over any county highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1480.5.

The road commissioner may immediately remove, or by notice may require the removal of, any of the following encroachments:

(a) An encroachment which obstructs or prevents the use of a county highway by the public.

(b) An encroachment which consists of refuse.

(c) An encroachment which is a traffic hazard.

(d) An encroachment which is an advertising sign or device of any description, unless excepted by subdivision (c) of Section 1460. The road commissioner may return such sign or device to its owner, or otherwise dispose of it in his discretion, except that if the commissioner determines in good faith that the sign or other device is of more than nominal value he shall not effect such other disposition until he has made a reasonable attempt to identify and notify the owner of the sign or device and provided a reasonable time for the owner to retrieve it under provisions of this section. The return of such sign or device to its owner may be conditioned upon payment of an amount sufficient to reimburse the road commissioner for the expense of removal.

The road commissioner may recover from the person causing any of the above encroachments, in an action brought in the name of the county for that purpose, the court costs of the road commissioner, the expense of such removal, and any other damages caused by the encroachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

1481.

The road commissioner may, by notice, require the removal of any other encroachment not specified in Section 1480.5 from any county highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

1482.

The notice referred to in Sections 1480.5 and 1481 shall be served upon the occupant or owner of the land, or the person causing, controlling or owning the encroachment, or shall be left at the place of residence of such occupant, owner or person if he resides in the county and is known to the person giving such notice. If the person upon whom notice is to be served does not reside in the county, the notice shall be posted on the encroachment. The notice shall specify the breadth of the highway, the place and extent of the encroachment, and shall require the removal of such encroachment within 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

1483.

If the encroachment is not removed, or its removal not commenced and diligently prosecuted, prior to the expiration of 10 days from and after the service or posting of the notice, the person causing, owning, or controlling the encroachment forfeits three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the encroachment continues unremoved. The road commissioner shall immediately remove an encroachment that effectually obstructs and prevents the use of the highway by vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1484.

If the encroachment is denied, and the owner or occupant of the land, or the person causing, owning or controlling the alleged encroachment refuses either to remove it or permit its removal, the road commissioner shall commence, in a court of competent jurisdiction, an action in the name of the county to abate the encroachment as a nuisance. If the commissioner recovers judgment he or she may, in addition to having the nuisance abated, recover a penalty of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the nuisance remains after service or posting of notice, and also the costs in the action, as provided in Section 1496.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1485.

If the encroachment is not denied, but is not removed within five days from and after service or posting of the notice, the road commissioner may remove the encroachment at the expense of the owner or occupant of the land, or the person causing, owning or controlling the encroachment. The commissioner may recover from the owner, occupant, or person, in an action brought in the name of the county for that purpose, the commissioner’s court costs and the expense of removal and also a penalty of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the encroachment remained after service or posting of the notice, as provided in Section 1496.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1486.

Gates shall not be allowed on any county highway except gates allowed by the board of supervisors in accordance with the provisions of section 966. If the expense of the erection and maintenance of such allowed gates is not paid as required by section 966, such gates shall be removed as an obstruction.

Any person who leaves any such gate open, or who wilfully and unnecessarily rides over ground adjoining the highway on which the gate is erected, shall be liable to the injured party for treble damages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1487.

A person who, by means of ditches or dams, obstructs or injures any county highway, diverts any watercourse into any county highway, or drains water from his or her land upon any county highway, to the injury of the highway, shall, upon notice by the road commissioner, immediately cease and discontinue the obstruction and injury, and shall repair the highway at his or her own expense. He or she is liable to a penalty of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the obstruction or injury remains, recoverable as provided in Section 1496, and is also guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1488.

(a) A person who, in storing or distributing water for any purpose, permits water to overflow or by seepage to saturate a county highway, to the injury of the highway, shall, upon notice by the road commissioner, immediately cease the overflow or seepage and repair the injury caused by the overflow or seepage.

(b) The person permitting the overflow or seepage is liable to a penalty of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the overflow or seepage continues, recoverable as provided in Section 1496.

(c) If the repair required by subdivision (a) is not made by the person within a reasonable time, as determined by the road commissioner, the road commissioner may make those repairs and recover the expense of the repairs from the person in an action at law brought in the name of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1488.5.

The notice referred to in Sections 1487 and 1488 shall be given in the same manner as provided in Section 1482, except that the action it requires shall be taken immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1489.

Unless a bridge is constructed in accordance with Section 1490, all persons excavating irrigation, mining or drainage ditches across county highways shall construct bridges across such ditches wherever such ditches cross such highways. If such persons fail to construct such bridges, the road commissioner shall construct them and shall recover from such persons, in an action at law brought in the name of the county, the expense of such construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

1490.

The board of supervisors of any county may construct and maintain bridges over any ditches which are used exclusively for irrigation purposes and which cross county highways in the county. Such board may, with the consent of the owners of such ditches, declare any of such bridges to be public property, and may then maintain and repair such bridges at the expense of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1491.

Any person who wilfully injures any county bridge is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is also liable for actual damages for such injury, to be recovered by the county in a civil action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1492.

Any person who wilfully removes or injures any mile-board, milestone or guide-post, or any inscription thereon, erected on any county highway, is liable for a penalty of ten dollars, recoverable as provided in section 1496, for every such offense, and is also guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1492.5.

Survey monuments shall be preserved, referenced, or replaced pursuant to Section 8771 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 458, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1493.

Any person may notify the occupant or owner of any land, from which a tree or other obstruction has fallen upon any county highway, to remove such tree or obstruction forthwith. If it is not thus removed, the owner or occupant is liable for the expense of removal and for a penalty of one dollar for every day after such notification that such tree or obstruction is not removed. The penalty and the expense of removal are recoverable as provided in section 1496.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1494.

Any person who cuts down a tree which falls into any county highway shall immediately remove the tree, and is liable for a penalty of ten dollars, recoverable as provided in section 1496, for every day such tree remains in the highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1495.

Any person who maliciously digs up, cuts down, injures or destroys any shade or ornamental tree on any county highway, unless such tree is considered an obstruction by the road commissioner and is removed under his direction, is liable to a penalty of one hundred dollars, recoverable as provided in section 1496, for each such tree.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1496.

The road commissioner shall recover all penalties or forfeitures given in this chapter and the recovery of which is not otherwise provided for, by suit in the name of the county. He shall pay such recoveries into the road fund.

The provisions of this section are applicable to Sections 1484, 1485, 1487, 1492, 1493, 1494, and 1495, and to any other provision in this chapter imposing penalties or forfeitures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Limited Maintenance Highway [1500. - 1500.]

1500.

The board of supervisors may adopt standards for limited maintenance of county highways which have a low traffic volume.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Highway Taxes [1550. - 1552.]

1550.

(a) A board of supervisors may form special road maintenance districts and levy special taxes for road and highway purposes to this chapter.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall authorize any property tax for highway purposes to be levied or collected by a county within any city wherein work and improvements upon the streets are done by virtue of any law relating to street work and improvements within such a city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 80.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.1.

The board of supervisors may form special road maintenance districts in unincorporated areas of the county wholly outside of incorporated cities. Formation of these districts may be ordered by the board when in its opinion additional road funds are necessary to properly maintain highways and roads in specific unincorporated areas of the county. These districts shall be formed by order of the board setting forth the boundaries thereof. A district shall be in existence until the board shall by its order discontinue the district. If a district is to be formed, the board shall set a date for a hearing on the formation. This hearing shall not be held in less than three weeks after the date of the order for the hearing, and prior to the date of the hearing, a notice of the hearing shall be published twice in a
 newspaper of general circulation in the area, and, in addition, at least three notices shall be posted in public places within the proposed district. At the hearing, protests, if any, shall be heard on the proposed formation of the district. It shall be within the power of the board to determine from the results of the hearing the necessity for the special road maintenance district, and, if it be deemed necessary, the district may be formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 81.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.2.

The board of supervisors may levy a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and spend the proceeds for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 83.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.3.

All work done in special road maintenance districts shall be done by the county road commissioner and all laws relating to the expenditure of road funds raised by property taxes shall apply to the expenditures of said districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, all revenues from special taxes levied for highway and road purposes collected in each road district shall be expended for highway and road purposes within the district in which collected.

The board of supervisors shall cause such tax collected each year to be apportioned to the several road districts entitled thereto, and to be kept by the county treasurer in separate funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 85.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Highway Funds [1580. - 1654.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1580. - 1580.]

1580.

The boards of supervisors, in their respective counties, shall audit all claims on the funds set apart for highway purposes and specify the funds from which the whole or any part of any claim shall be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Highway Funds [1622. - 1630.]

1622.

All amounts paid to each county, out of money derived from the Highway Users Tax Fund shall be deposited in a “road fund” which each board of supervisors shall establish for that purpose.

Interest received by a county from the investment of money in its road fund shall be deposited in the fund and shall be used for road purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 344.)
-------------------------------------------

1623.

The board of supervisors of any county may expend any portion of the amounts thus received by that county in the construction, maintenance, improvement or repair of streets, bridges, and culverts within those cities in the county the governing bodies of which by ordinance or resolution authorize such work of acquisition of any real property or interest therein, or rights-of-way, construction, maintenance, improvement or repair. For this purpose each board of supervisors shall provide by ordinance the basis and conditions upon which allocations will be made from its road fund for expenditure upon streets, bridges, and culverts in cities within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1623.5.

None of the amounts paid to the counties shall be used for the construction or improvement of any highway or street if the contract for such construction or improvement specifies the use of any patented or proprietary paving material, unless the contract has been awarded to the lowest responsible bidder therefor after alternate bids have been called for and opportunity afforded for bids to be submitted for nonpatented or nonproprietary paving material in competition with an equal thickness and like design of such patented or proprietary paving material. This section shall not be deemed nor construed to prohibit the use of any patented or proprietary paving material in the maintenance of any highway or street when such highway or street has been constructed of such material and, in the opinion of the body, board or officer ordering such maintenance, it would be impractical to use a different paving material for such maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.

The board of supervisors of any county may, as provided in Section 1625, expend any portion of the amounts paid to that county, and deposited in the road fund, for the acquisition of rights-of-way and the construction of any public highway outside of its county limits, whenever such construction is authorized by ordinance or resolution of the board of supervisors of the county in which the highway is to be constructed or for the acquisition of rights-of-way for, or the construction, improvement or maintenance of, any State highway pursuant to a contract made as provided in Section 130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.

Where such authorization is given, the board of supervisors of the county desiring the construction may:

(a) Expend, through its own officers or agencies, the amounts authorized by section 1624.

(b) By resolution transfer such amounts to the account of the commission or to the account of the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, and may by such resolution specify and determine the location and type of construction of such highway. The amount thus transferred shall, if accepted by the Commission or the Secretary of Agriculture, be expended exclusively for the purpose specified and determined in the resolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.

Power hereby is granted to the board of supervisors of any county, to construct, maintain, improve and repair any county highway which in whole or in part forms the boundary line between said county and another county in this State or any other state, or which in its meanderings crosses and recrosses such boundary line; and to acquire by purchase or condemnation any lands or rights-of-way within this State, necessary for such boundary highway; and to enter into joint contracts with authorities of adjoining counties within or without the State, for the construction, maintenance, improvement and repair of such highways. Any such highway shall be considered a county highway and expenditures may be made thereon from funds received by the county from the Highway Users Tax Fund to the extent provided by law for county highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.

The board of supervisors of any county, by resolution adopted by four-fifths of the members thereof, may establish a county highway right of way acquisition revolving fund, to be used in acquiring rights of way for county highway purposes through purchase or condemnation. Money on deposit in said fund shall at no time exceed one-half of 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1478.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.

The board of supervisors of any county which has established a county highway right of way acquisition revolving fund, may by resolution call an election to obtain authorization for the issuance and sale of bonds to finance the acquisition of rights of way for county highway purposes. Such bonds may be issued if approved by two-thirds of the electors voting at any regular or special election called for such purpose, and shall be limited in amount to one-half of 1 percent of the current assessed valuation of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1478.)
-------------------------------------------

1629.

The board of supervisors of any county which has established a county highway right of way acquisition revolving fund may place on deposit in such fund any moneys available to such county for county highway purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1478.)
-------------------------------------------

1630.

The board of supervisors may use any appropriate method of funding the planning, designing, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance, and operation of the county expressway system designated pursuant to Section 941.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 367, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Apportionment of Road District Funds [1650. - 1654.]

1650.

For the purposes of this article, the unencumbered funds of the district are the sum of all money, uncollected taxes, and other uncollected accounts belonging to or due to such district, in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all claims and accounts against the district, including both claims and accounts lawfully payable from the funds of such district on the date of annexation or incorporation, and claims and accounts which will become payable from such funds by reason of lawful contracts in force on that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Whenever any territory is included in any city, either at the original incorporation of such city, or by subsequent annexation thereto, and such territory constitutes all or part of a road district, the county surveyor or, in a county not having a county surveyor, the officer having similar duties and authority, shall indicate on the map books of the county assessor the property incorporated or annexed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1652.

The assessor shall then ascertain from his records the assessed value of such incorporated or annexed property on the lien date and shall certify to the county auditor such value thus ascertained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

The auditor shall then calculate the proportion that the assessed value, on the preceding lien date of the property annexed or incorporated bears to the total assessed value, as of that day, of all the property in the district from which the annexation or incorporation was made. He shall prepare a claim in favor of the city, to be allowed by the board of supervisors and paid by warrant on the treasurer, for that part of the unencumbered funds of the district which bears the same proportion to the whole of such unencumbered funds as the assessed value of the property annexed or incorporated bears to the total assessed value of all the property in the district from which the annexation or incorporation was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

Such city shall repay to the county its proportion of all taxes for highway purposes on the annexed or incorporated portion of such district which are subsequently refunded or canceled. The money paid to such city, pursuant to this article, shall be expended for highway purposes only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Cooperation by Counties [1670. - 1732.]



  ARTICLE 1. Cooperation with United States Government [1670. - 1672.]

1670.

The board of supervisors of any county may enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, or other properly authorized officer of the United States, for the survey, construction, and maintenance of highways or trails within such county, or for the survey, construction, and maintenance of highways or trails outside of its county limits, including highways or trails lying partly within and partly without the boundaries of the State, where authorization therefor is given by ordinance or resolution of the board of supervisors or other properly authorized agency of the county in which such highways or trails or a portion thereof are to be constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

1671.

The agreements shall be entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 of the act of Congress, approved July 11, 1916, entitled “An act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in the construction of rural post roads and for other purposes,” or pursuant to the provisions of Section 23 of the Federal-Aid Highway Act, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the county and the Secretary of Agriculture.

The county board of supervisors may incur expenses necessary to perform its part of the cooperative agreements, and may pay the cost and expenses of the agreements out of the county general fund or such other fund as the board of supervisors designates or otherwise provides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 80.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

Upon request of the proper officer of the United States, together with the order of the board of supervisors of the county, the county treasurer shall deposit with the Federal Reserve Bank to the credit of the United States all money set aside by the board of supervisors under agreements entered into with the United States in accordance with the provisions of the Federal-Aid Highway Act and subsequent acts of like nature. The money shall be paid out by the proper fiscal agent of the United States pursuant to the agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 80.7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cooperation with Cities [1680. - 1686.]

1680.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of its members, determine that any of the following activities are of general county interest and that county aid shall be extended therefor:

(a) The laying out, opening, construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, or altering of all or any part of any street within a city or extending along or across the boundary of a city.

(b) The establishing, modifying or changing the grade of any such street.

(c) The separation of the grades of any two or more such streets which intersect.

(d) The separation of the grade of any such street from the grade of any steam, electric or street railroad crossing such street.

(e) The construction of the necessary pavements, curbs, culverts, bridges, tunnels, subways, viaducts, drainage facilities or structures incident to or a part of such street.

(f) The acquisition of any real property or interest therein, rights of way or other property necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

1681.

Such resolution shall specify the proposed new or existing street or portion of street, the general nature of the improvement proposed, the nature of the aid to be furnished by the county, and any funds from which the aid is to be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.

Thereafter and in accordance with such resolution the county may give aid in one or more of the following ways:

(a) Contribute money.

(b) Acquire and deliver material.

(c) Furnish labor or engineering services.

(d) Loan its road building machinery.

(e) Pay or contribute money to be used for the payment of interest upon, or for the payment or redemption of, bonds, the proceeds of which have been used for, or which have been issued in payment for, work mentioned in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1683.

The expense of such aid may be paid from one or more of the following:

(a) The county general fund.

(b) The road fund.

(c) The proceeds of any county bond issue voted for the purpose of laying out, constructing, maintaining, improving or repairing county highways or for the acquisition of any real property or interest therein, rights of way or other property necessary for such purposes.

(d) Any other fund available for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.

The city shall use all aid which it receives in the activities described in the resolution and shall return to the county any portion of such aid which is not thus used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1685.

Boards of supervisors may enter into contracts or agreements with the legislative body of any city for the purposes specified in Section 1803.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1686.

The Legislature hereby finds that the improvement and maintenance of all city streets is of general county interest. The board of supervisors of any county may, by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of its members, determine that county aid shall be extended for the improvement or maintenance of streets within a city or extending along or across the boundary of a city.

Such resolution shall specify the general nature of the improvement and maintenance proposed, the nature of the aid to be furnished by the county, and any funds from which the aid is to be paid. Such resolution need not specify the streets to be improved or maintained within such city but may in general terms specify the general character of the work proposed and require such reports and accounting of the expenditure of such aid funds as it may find to be necessary and convenient. The provisions of this section shall be deemed as an alternative procedure to that otherwise specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Extension of County Highways Through Cities [1700. - 1706.]

1700.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of its members, declare any highway in the county lying in whole or in part within a city to be a county highway for one or more of the following purposes: acquisition of rights-of-way, construction, maintenance, improvement, or repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

A copy of such resolution shall be forwarded to the governing body of the city within which is included any portion of the highway. Such governing body may consent to the establishment of such included portion as a part of the county highway. Upon the taking effect of an ordinance or resolution containing such consent, such portion of such highway shall become a county highway for one or more of the following purposes: acquisition of rights-of-way, construction, maintenance, improvement, or repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

Thereafter the board of supervisors of the county may acquire rights-of-way for, construct, maintain, improve, or repair such highway in the same manner as other county highways, and may pay for such work out of one or more of the following:

(a) The county general fund.

(b) The road fund.

(c) The proceeds of any county bond issue voted for the purpose of laying out, constructing, maintaining, improving or repairing county highways.

(d) Any other fund available for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 485.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.
